Utah statutes.
41-6a-1643.   Development of standardized emissions inspection and
maintenance program.
(1)  The county legislative body of each county in which an emissions
inspection and maintenance program for motor vehicles is implemented to meet
National Ambient Air Quality Standards may enter into an agreement under Title
11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, to develop an emissions inspection
and maintenance program that:
(a)  requires standardized, computerized testing equipment;
(b)  provides for reciprocity, so that a person required to submit an
emissions certificate for vehicle registration may obtain an emissions
certificate from any county in which a vehicle emissions inspection and
maintenance program is in operation; and
(c)  requires standardized emissions standards for all counties entering into
an agreement under this section.
(2)  Emissions standards set under Subsection (1) shall allow all counties
identified in Subsection (1) to meet the National Ambient Air Quality
Standards.
(3)  Each county legislative body entering into an agreement under Subsection
(1) shall make regulations or ordinances to implement the emissions inspection
and maintenance program developed under Subsection (1).
